dictionaries/or_IN.dic
934
ଅଂଶ
ଅକାମୀ
ଅକ୍ଷ
ଅକ୍ଷର
ଅକ୍ଷରମାଳା
ଅକ୍ଷରରୂପ
ଅଗ୍ରଗତି
ଅଗ୍ରାଧିକାର
ଅଙ୍କ/C
ଅଚଳ
ଅଛି
ଅଜଣା
ଅଜ୍ଞାତ
ଅଞ୍ଚଳ
ଅଟକ
ଅତିରିକ୍ତ
ଅତ୍ଯଧିକ
ଅଦିଶ
ଅଦୃଶ୍ଯ
ଅଦ୍ଯତନ/C
ଅଧିକ
ଅଧିତଥ୍ଯ
ଅଧିଫାଇଲ
ଅଧିବୃତ୍ତ
ଅଧିବେଶନ
ଅଧିସୂଚନା
ଅଧୀନ
ଅନନ୍ତ
ଅନୁକୂଳନ
ଅନୁକ୍ରମ
ଅନୁକ୍ରମଣିକା
ଅନୁପସ୍ଥିତ
ଅନୁପାତ
ଅନୁବାଦ
ଅନୁମତି
ଅନୁରୂପ
ଅନୁରୋଧ
ଅନୁଲଗ୍ନ
ଅନୁଲିପି
ଅନୁଷ୍ଠାନ
ଅନୁସନ୍ଧାନ
ଅନୁସ୍ଥାପନ
ଅନ୍ତରାପୃଷ୍ଠ
ଅନ୍ବେଷଣ
ଅନ୍ଯାନ୍ଯ
ଅପବାହ
ଅପରିଚାଳିତ
ଅପରିବର୍ତ୍ତନୀୟ
ଅପସନ୍ଦ
ଅପସାରଣ/N
ଅପେକ୍ଷମାଣ
ଅବକ୍ଷେପଣ
ଅବଧି
ଅବରେଖା
ଅବରୋଧ
ଅବଲମ୍ବନ
ଅବଲୋକନ
ଅବଶେଷ
ଅବସଙ୍କେତକ
ଅବସ୍ଥା/C
ଅବସ୍ଥିତ/F
ଅବାସ୍ତବ
ଅବିରତ
ଅବୈଧ
ଅଭିଧାନ
ଅଭିବାଦନ
ଅଭିବ୍ଯକ୍ତି
ଅଭିଲେଖାଗାର
ଅଭ୍ଯନ୍ତର
ଅମଳକୃତ
ଅମୂର୍ତ୍ତ
ଅମେଳ
ଅଲଗା
ଅଷ୍ଟ
ଅସଞ୍ଚିତ
ଅସଫଳ
ଅସମର୍ଥ
ଅସମ୍ପୂର୍ଣ୍ଣ
ଅସମ୍ଭବ
ଅସ୍ତିତ୍ବ
ଅସ୍ପଷ୍ଟ
ଅସ୍ବଚ୍ଛତା
ଅସ୍ବାଭାବିକ
ଆଂଶିକ
ଆଇନେଟଡି
ଆଇସଲାଣ୍ଡୀୟ
ଆଉଟ
ଆକଳନ
ଆକାର
ଆଖପାଖ
ଆଗକୁ
ଆଗପଛ
ଆଗ୍ରହ
ଆଙ୍କିବା
ଆଚରଣ
ଆଦାନପ୍ରଦାନ
ଆଧାର
ଆନତି
ଆନ୍ତର୍ଜାତୀୟ
ଆପଲ୍
ଆପୋଷ୍ଟ୍ରୋଫି
ଆପ୍ଲିକ୍ସ
ଆପ୍ଲେଟ୍
ଆବରଣ
ଆବାହନ
ଆବୃତ୍ତି
ଆଭାସ/E
ଆଭ୍ଯନ୍ତରୀଣ
ଆମଦାନୀ
ଆମେରିକୀୟ
ଆରବୀୟ
ଆର୍ମେନିନୀୟ
ଆଲଫା
ଆଲେଖ/E
ଆଲ୍ବମ୍
ଆଳାପ
ଆସିବା
ଆସ୍କି
ଆହରଣ
ଆୟତକ୍ଷେତ୍ର
ଆୟର୍ଲାଣ୍ଡୀୟ
ଇଂରାଜୀ
ଇଚ୍ଛାଧୀନ
ଇଚ୍ଛାରୂପଣ
ଇଞ୍ଜିନିଅରିଙ୍ଗ୍
ଇଟା
ଇଟାଲୀୟ
ଇଣ୍ଟରନେଟ୍
ଇତିହାସ
ଇଥରନେଟ୍
ଇନ
ଉକ୍ତି
ଉଚ୍ଚତର
ଉଚ୍ଚତା
ଉତ୍ପତ୍ତି
ଉତ୍ପାଦ
ଉତ୍ସ
ଉଦାରମନା
ଉଦାହରଣ
ଉନ୍ନୟନ
ଉପଆବରଣ
ଉପକରଣ
ଉପଜାଲକ
ଉପତାଲିକା
ଉପପଥ
ଉପବାକ୍ଯଖଣ୍ଡ
ଉପଯୁକ୍ତ
ଉପରେ
ଉପଲବ୍ଧ
ଉପସର୍ଗ
ଉପାଦାନ
ଉପାୟ
ଉର୍ଦ୍ଧଲିପି
ଉଲଙ୍ଘନ
ଏକକାଂଶ
ଏକତ୍ରିତ
ଏକବର୍ଣଣି
ଏକାଧିକ
ଏକାପ୍ରକାର
ଏକ୍ସଟେନସନ୍
ଏଠାରେ
ଏସ୍ପେରାଣ୍ଟୋ
ଓଜନ
ଓଲଟା
ଓସାର
କଙ୍କାଳରୂପ
କଟିଗଲା
କଡ଼ରେ
କଡ଼ୂଆ
କଥା
କମା
କମ୍ପ୍ଯୁଟର
କର/DAcf
କରନ୍ତୁ
କରମର୍ଦ୍ଦନ
କଳାକାର
କସ
କାଟ/DXM
କାଢ଼ିବା
କାନାଡୀୟ
କାମ
କାରଖାନା
କାରିକା
କାର୍ଯ୍ଯ/Jb
କାର୍ଯ୍ଯପୁସ୍ତିକା
କାର୍ଯ୍ଯବ୍ଯସ୍ତ
କାଲେଣ୍ଡର
କାଲ୍କୁଲେଟର
କାଳ
କିବୋର୍ଡ
କିଲୋବାଇଟ
କେନ୍ଦ୍ର/Q
କେବଳ
କୋଣ
କୋରୀୟ
କୋର୍ବା
କୋଳାହଳପୂର୍ଣ୍ଣ
କୋଷ
କୋସାଇନ
କୌଣସି
କ୍ଯାମେରା
କ୍ଯାଶେ
କ୍ରମ
କ୍ରମବର୍ଦ୍ଧିଷ୍ଣୁ
କ୍ରମବୀକ୍ଷଣ
କ୍ରମମୁକ୍ତ
କ୍ରମାନୁସାରେ
କ୍ରିୟା/PI
କ୍ଲିପବୋର୍ଡ
କ୍ଷୁଦ୍ରତମନ
କ୍ଷୁଦ୍ରତର
କ୍ଷେତ୍ର
କ୍ଷୟ
ଖଣ୍ଡ
ଖାତା
ଖାରଜ
ଖାଲି
ଖେଳ
ଖୋଜ/D
ଖୋଲା
ଗଣକ
ଗଣନା
ଗତାନୁଗତିକ
ଗନ୍ତବ୍ଯସ୍ଥଳୀ
ଗମ୍ଭୀରତା
ଗାମା
ଗୁଣ/zK
ଗୁଣଧର୍ମ
ଗୁରୁତ୍ବପୂର୍ଣ୍ଣ
ଗେଲିକ
ଗୋପନୀୟ
ଗ୍ନୁ
ଗ୍ରହଣ/h
ଗ୍ରାଡିଆନ
ଗ୍ରାହକ
ଗ୍ରୀକ
ଗ୍ଲେଡ
ଘଟଣା
ଘଣ୍ଟା
ଘୁମନ୍ତ
ଘୂରିବା
ଘୂର୍ଣ୍ଣନ
ଚକ୍ରିଳ
ଚତୁର
ଚଲାଇବା
ଚଳ/oCR
ଚଳବିନ୍ଦୁ
ଚଳମାନ
ଚାନେଲ
ଚାବି
ଚାରିପାଖ
ଚାଲିଛି
ଚାଳକ
ଚାଳନ/B
ଚିତ୍ର/tA
ଚିତ୍ରପଟ
ଚିହ୍ନ/Q
ଚିହ୍ନାବଳୀ
ଚୀନୀୟ
ଚେକୋସ୍ଲୋଭାକୀୟ
ଚେତାବନୀ
ଚେଷ୍ଟା
ଚେହେରା
ଚୟକ
ଚୟନ
ଚୟିତ
ଛକି
ଛଣା
ଛନ୍ଦିବା
ଛାଞ୍ଚ
ଛାଡ଼/DM
ଛାୟା
ଛେଦ
ଛୋଟେଇବା
ଜଣାଯିବା
ଜନ୍ତା
ଜରୁରୀ
ଜର୍ମାନ
ଜାଗତିକ
ଜାପାନୀ
ଜାବୁଡ଼ିବା
ଜାଭା
ଜାଲକ
ଜାଲି
ଜୀବନାୟନ
ଜ୍ଯାମିତି
ଝରକା
ଟର୍ମିନାଲ
ଟାଇଲ
ଟାର୍
ଟିପାଖାତା
ଟିପ୍ପଣୀ
ଟିଫ୍
ଟିଲ୍ଡେ
ଟୀକା
ଟେଲ୍ନେଟ୍
ଟୋପା
ଟ୍ଯାବ୍
ଠିକଣା
ଡସ୍
ଡାଇଆରେସିସ୍
ଡାଏଲ
ଡାକ/DZl
ଡାଟାବେଶ୍
ଡାହାଣ
ଡିଗ୍ରୀ
ଡିମନ
ଡିରେକ୍ଟୋରି
ଡିସ୍କ
ଡିିସ୍କ
ଡେନମାର୍କୀୟ
ଡେସ୍କଟପ୍
ଡ୍ରାଇଭ୍
ଡ୍ରୟର
ଢାଞ୍ଚା
ତତ୍ତ୍ବ
ତତ୍ବାବଧାରକ
ତଥ୍ଯ
ତନ୍ତ୍ର
ତଳକୁ
ତଳେ
ତାର
ତାର୍କିକ
ତାଲିକା
ତାଳହୀନ
ତିର୍ଯ୍ଯକ/H
ତୀର
ତୁରନ୍ତ
ତୁର୍କୀୟ
ତୁଳନା
ତେରଛା
ତ୍ବରକ
ତ୍ବରଣ
ତ୍ରୁଟି
ତ୍ରୁଟିପୂର୍ଣ୍ଣ
ଥାଇ
ଥାକ
ଦକ୍ଷିଣାବର୍ତ୍ତ
ଦଣ୍ଡ
ଦନ୍ତୁର
ଦବାଅ
ଦବାନ୍ତୁ
ଦର୍ଶକ
ଦର୍ଶନ
ଦର୍ଶିକା
ଦଲିଲ
ଦଶମିକ
ଦାବିଦେଇଯିବା
ଦିଗକୁ
ଦୁଇଗୁଣ
ଦୂର/H
ଦୃଶ୍ଯ
ଦୃଶ୍ଯମାନ୍ଯତା
ଦୃଷ୍ଟିସଂକ୍ରାନ୍ତ
ଦେଖନ୍ତୁ
ଦେବା
ଦେହ
ଦୋଳନ
ଦୋଷ
ଦ୍ବିତୀୟ
ଦ୍ବିପଦୀ
ଦ୍ବିମିକ
ଧକ୍କା
ଧରିବା
ଧାଡ଼ି/e
ଧାର/BGAr
ଧାରଣ/GS
ଧ୍ବନି
ନକଲ/F
ନକ୍ସା
ନଟିଲସ୍
ନତି
ନବଲିଖନ
ନମୁନା
ନାମ
ନାମପଟି
ନାମବଦଳା
ନାମହୀନ
ନାହିଁ
ନିଃଶୁଳ୍କ
ନିଗମିତ
ନିବନ୍ଧ
ନିବାସୀ
ନିବେଶ
ନିମ୍ନରେଖା
ନିମ୍ନସ୍ଥାନୀୟ
ନିରୂପକ
ନିରୂପଣ
ନିର୍ଗମ
ନିର୍ଘଣ୍ଟକ
ନିର୍ଦ୍ଦିଷ୍ଟ
ନିର୍ଦ୍ଦେଶ
ନିର୍ଦ୍ଧାରିତ
ନିର୍ଭରତା
ନିର୍ଭରିତ
ନିର୍ଭରୋକ୍ତି
ନିର୍ମାଣ
ନିର୍ଯ୍ଯାସ
ନିଲମ୍ବନ
ନିଶ୍ଚିତ/C
ନିଷ୍କାସନ
ନିଷ୍କ୍ରିୟ/A
ନିଷ୍ପାଦନ
ନିହିତ
ନିୟନ୍ତ୍ରକ
ନିୟନ୍ତ୍ରଣ
ନିୟମିତ
ନୀତି
ନୂଆ
ନେଟ୍ମାସ୍କ
ନେଟ୍ସ୍କେପ୍
ନୋଡ୍
ନୋମ୍
ନୋର୍ଡୀୟ
ନୋରୱେନୀୟ
ପକାନ୍ତୁ
ପଛକୁ
ପଛୁଆ
ପଞ୍ଜିକା
ପଟି
ପଟ୍ଟିକା
ପଠନୀୟ
ପଠାଇବା
ପଢ଼ିନେବା
ପଢ଼ିବା
ପତ୍ର
ପଥ
ପଥନାମ
ପଥପର୍ଦଶନ
ପଦକ୍ଷେପ
ପଦ୍ଧତି
ପରଦା
ପରବର୍ତ୍ତୀ
ପରମ
ପରିଚାଳକ
ପରିଚାୟକ
ପରିଚୟ
ପରିଣାମ
ପରିତ୍ଯାଗ
ପରିପୃକ୍ତ
ପରିପ୍ରକାଶ
ପରିବର୍ତ୍ତକ
ପରିବର୍ତ୍ତନ
ପରିବର୍ତ୍ତେ
ପରିବେଶ
ପରିମାଣ
ପରିର୍ବତ୍ତନ
ପରିସଂଖ୍ଯାନ
ପରିସର
ପରୀକ୍ଷଣ
ପର୍ତ୍ତୁଗୀଜ୍
ପର୍ଲ
ପସନ୍ଦ
ପାଇପ୍
ପାଇବା
ପାଠ୍ଯ
ପାତ୍ର
ପାଦାଙ୍କ
ପାଦିକା
ପାରମ୍ପରିକ
ପାରସ୍ପରିକ
ପାର୍ଶ୍ବପଟି
ପାର୍ଶ୍ବସଜ୍ଜା
ପାର୍ଶ୍ବୀକରଣ
ପାର୍ସଲ
ପାଶ୍ଚାତ୍ଯ
ପିକ୍ସମ୍ଯାପ୍
ପିକ୍ସେଲ୍
ପିଢ଼ି
ପୁନଃପ୍ରଦର୍ଶନ
ପୁନଃପ୍ରେରଣ
ପୁନଃସ୍ଥାପନ
ପୁନରାବର୍ତ୍ତନ
ପୁନରାବୃତ୍ତି
ପୁନରୁଦ୍ଧାର
ପୁନର୍ଚାଳନ
ପୁନର୍ଧାରଣ
ପୁନର୍ଲିଖନୀୟ
ପୁସ୍ତକ
ପୂର୍ଣ୍ଣ
ପୂର୍ଣ୍ଣଚ୍ଛେଦ
ପୂର୍ବବର୍ତ୍ତୀ
ପୂର୍ବାନୁମାନ
ପୃଷ୍ଠଭୂମି
ପୃଷ୍ଠା
ପେଜର
ପୋତାଶ୍ରୟ
ପୋଲାଣ୍ଡୀୟ
ପୋଷ୍ଟସ୍କ୍ରିପ୍ଟ
ପ୍ଯାକେଜ୍
ପ୍ଯାକେଟ୍
ପ୍ଯାଡିଙ୍ଗ୍
ପ୍ଯାଲେଟ୍
ପ୍ରକଳନ
ପ୍ରକଳ୍ପ
ପ୍ରକାର
ପ୍ରକୃତ
ପ୍ରକ୍ରିୟା
ପ୍ରକ୍ଷେପଣ
ପ୍ରଚଳିତ
ପ୍ରଚାଳକ
ପ୍ରଚିହ୍ନ
ପ୍ରଚେଷ୍ଟା
ପ୍ରଣାଳୀ
ପ୍ରତି/pwxaTd
ପ୍ରତିକ୍ରିୟା
ପ୍ରତିଧ୍ବନି
ପ୍ରତିରୋଧୀ
ପ୍ରତୀକ
ପ୍ରତ୍ଯକେ
ପ୍ରତ୍ଯାଖାନ
ପ୍ରଦର୍ଶକ
ପ୍ରଦର୍ଶନ
ପ୍ରଦର୍ଶିତ
ପ୍ରବଳତା
ପ୍ରବେଶାନୁମତି
ପ୍ରବେଶିକୃତ
ପ୍ରଭାବ/C
ପ୍ରଭାବସୀମା
ପ୍ରରୂପ
ପ୍ରଶାସକ
ପ୍ରଶ୍ନ
ପ୍ରସଙ୍ଗ
ପ୍ରସରଣ
ପ୍ରସାର
ପ୍ରସ୍ତାବ
ପ୍ରସ୍ତୁତ/F
ପ୍ରସ୍ଥାନ
ପ୍ରାଚଳ
ପ୍ରାପକ
ପ୍ରାରମ୍ଭ/O
ପ୍ରାରମ୍ଭିକ/yL
ପ୍ରାର୍ଥୀ
ପ୍ରାସଙ୍ଗିକତା
ପ୍ରାୟୋଜକ
ପ୍ରିୟ
ପ୍ରେରଣ
ପ୍ରୋଟୋକଲ୍
ପ୍ରୋଡିଜି
ପ୍ରୟୋଗ
ପ୍ଲଗ୍ଇନ୍
ଫଟୋ
ଫରାସୀ
ଫର୍ମ
ଫାଇଲ
ଫାଇଲ୍
ଫାକ୍ସ
ଫାରୋଇଜ୍
ଫାର୍ମୱେର
ଫିନ୍ଲାଣ୍ଡୀୟ
ଫେଡ଼ାଣ
ଫେରସ୍ତ
ଫୋଲ୍ଡର
ଫ୍ରେମ୍
ଫ୍ଲପି
ଫ୍ଲାଶ୍
ବଣ୍ଟନ
ବଣ୍ଟିତ
ବଦଳ/PGR
ବଦଳା/n
ବନାନ
ବନ୍ଦ
ବନ୍ଧନ/E
ବଫର
ବର୍ଗ/L
ବର୍ଗମୂଳ
ବର୍ଜିତ
ବର୍ଣ୍ଣନା/I
ବର୍ତ୍ତମାନ
ବସ୍
ବହୁବିଧ
ବହୁଭୁଜ
ବହୁରେଖା
ବାଇଟ୍
ବାକ୍ଯଖଣ୍ଡ
ବାକ୍ଯାଂଶ
ବାକ୍ସ
ବାଣ୍ଟିବା
ବାତିଲ
ବାଧା
ବାମ/V
ବାରମ୍ବାର
ବାଲ୍ଟିକ୍
ବାସ୍ତବରେ
ବାହାରିବା
ବାହାରେ
ବାହ୍ଯତମ
ବାହ୍ଯରେଖା
ବିକଳନ
ବିକଳ୍ପ
ବିକାଶକାରୀ
ବିକ୍ରେତା
ବିକ୍ରୟଯୋଗ୍ଯତା
ବିଚ୍ଯୁତି
ବିଜ୍ଞପ୍ତି
ବିଟମ୍ଯାପ୍
ବିଟ୍
ବିଧି
ବିନ୍ଦୁ
ବିନ୍ଯାସ
ବିବରଣିକା
ବିବରଣୀ
ବିବିକ୍ତ
ବିବିଧତା
ବିଭାଗ
ବିଭାଜକ
ବିଭାଜନ
ବିଭାଜିକା
ବିଭେଦନ
ବିଯୁକ୍ତ
ବିରତି
ବିରାମ
ବିଶୃଙ୍ଖଳିତ
ବିଶେଷ
ବିଶେଷଦର୍ଶିତ
ବିଶ୍ଲେଷଣ
ବିଶ୍ଳେଷକ
ବିଶ୍ଳେଷଣ
ବିଷୟ
ବିସ୍ତାର/A
ବିସ୍ତୃତ/F
ବୁଟ୍
ବୁଲିଆନ୍
ବୁଲ୍ଗେରୀୟ
ବୃକ୍ଷ
ବୃତ୍ତାଂଶ
ବୃତ୍ତାକାର
ବୃଦ୍ଧି
ବୃହତ୍ତମନ
ବୃହତ୍ତର
ବେସିକ୍
ବୈଦ୍ଯ
ବୈଧ/OT
ବୋଧଗମ୍ଯ
ବୋର୍ଡ
ବ୍ଯକ୍ତିକ
ବ୍ଯକ୍ତିଗତ
ବ୍ଯତିକ୍ରମ
ବ୍ଯତୀତ
ବ୍ଯବସ୍ଥା
ବ୍ଯାଟେରୀ
ବ୍ଯାହତ
ବ୍ରାଉଜର
ବ୍ରାଉଜ୍
ବ୍ରାଜିଲୀୟ
ବ୍ରିଟିଶ
ବ୍ରିଟେନୀୟ
ବ୍ଲକ
ଭଗ୍ନାଂଶ
ଭଣ୍ଡାର
ଭବିଷ୍ଯତ
ଭରଣ
ଭର୍ତ୍ତିକରିବା
ଭଲ
ଭାଗ
ଭାବ
ଭାବରେ
ଭାଷା
ଭିଏତନାମୀ
ଭିଡିଓ
ଭିତରକୁ
ଭୁଲ
ଭୂଲମ୍ବ
ଭୂସମାନ୍ତର
ଭୌତିକ
ମଡେଲ
ମଣ୍ଡଳ
ମଧ୍ଯମା
ମଧ୍ଯରେ
ମଧ୍ଯରେଖିତ
ମନୋ
ମନୋରଞ୍ଜନ
ମସିହା
ମସୃଣ
ମାଇକ୍ରୋଫୋନ୍
ମାଇମ
ମାଉସ
ମାକ୍
ମାକ୍ରନ
ମାକ୍ରୋ
ମାଧ୍ଯମ
ମାନକ
ମାନଚିତ୍ର
ମାନଦଣ୍ଡ
ମାପ/B
ମାରାତ୍ମକ
ମାର୍କ
ମାଲିକ
ମିଡି
ମିନିକ୍ସ୍
ମିଲିମିଟର
ମିଶ୍ରକ
ମିଶ୍ରଣ
ମିଶ୍ରିତ
ମୁକ୍ତସଙ୍କେତ
ମୁଦ୍ରଣ/E
ମୂଲ୍ଯ
ମୂଳ
ମେନୁ
ମେଳ/Bj
ମୋଡ଼ା
ମୋଡ଼ିବା
ମୋଡେମ
ଯଥେଷ୍ଟ
ଯନ୍ତ୍ର
ଯନ୍ତ୍ରାଂଶ
ଯାଞ୍ଚ/S
ଯାନ୍ତ୍ରାନୁକରଣ
ଯିବା
ଯୁକ୍ତିଯୁକ୍ତ
ଯୋଗ
ଯୋଜନା
ରକ୍ଷଣାବେକ୍ଷଣ
ରଖିବା
ରଙ୍ଗ/J
ରପ୍ତାନୀ
ରମ୍
ରହିଛି
ରୀତି
ରୁଷୀୟ
ରୂପରେଖ
ରୂପାନ୍ତର/BA
ରୂପାୟନ
ରେଖା
ରେଖାଙ୍କନ
ରେଖାଚିତ୍ର
ରେଡିଆନ୍
ରେଡିଓ
ରୋମାନୀୟ
ଲଗଆଉଟ୍
ଲଗଇନ୍
ଲଗାଅ
ଲଗାରିଦ୍ମ୍
ଲଗ୍
ଲବ୍ଧ
ଲମ୍ବ
ଲାଇନ୍ଛଡ଼ା
ଲାଇନ୍ଯୁକ୍ତ
ଲାଇବ୍ରେରୀ
ଲାଇସେନ୍ସ
ଲାଟିନ
ଲାମ୍ବଡ଼ା
ଲିଖନ
ଲିନକ୍ସ
ଲିଭାଇବା
ଲୁକ୍କାୟନ
ଲୁଚାଇବା
ଲେଖକ
ଲେଖିବା
ଲୋକେଲ
ଲୋଗୋ
ଶତକଡ଼ା
ଶବ୍ଦ
ଶର୍ପକ
ଶାଖା/U
ଶିଫ୍ଟ
ଶୀର୍ଷକ
ଶୂନ୍ଯ
ଶେଷ
ଶୈଳୀ
ଶୋଧକ
ଶ୍ରାବ୍ଯ
ଶ୍ରେଣୀ
ଷୋହଳମିକ
ଷ୍ଟେରିଓ
ସଂକଳନ
ସଂକାର୍ଯ୍ଯ
ସଂକେତ
ସଂକ୍ଷେପ
ସଂଖ୍ଯା/I
ସଂଗୁପ୍ତ
ସଂଗ୍ରହ
ସଂଯୁକ୍ତି
ସଂଯୋଗ/E
ସଂଯୋଗିକୀ
ସଂଯୋଜନା
ସଂରକ୍ଷକ
ସଂରକ୍ଷଣ
ସଂରକ୍ଷିତ
ସଂରୂପ
ସଂଲଗ୍ନିତ
ସଂଳାପ
ସଂସାଧକ
ସଂସାଧନ
ସଂସ୍କରଣ
ସକର୍ମକ
ସକେଟ
ସକ୍ରିୟ/BA
ସଙ୍କଳକ
ସଙ୍କେତ/B
ସଙ୍ଗତ
ସଜାଡ଼ିବା
ସଜାନ୍ତୁ
ସଜ୍ଜା
ସଜ୍ଜିକରଣ
ସଞ୍ଚାଳକ
ସଞ୍ଚାଳନ
ସଞ୍ଚିକା
ସଠିକ/H
ସତେଜନ
ସତ୍ଯ
ସନ୍ଦର୍ଭ
ସନ୍ଦେଶ
ସନ୍ଦେହଜନକ
ସନ୍ନିବେଶଯୋଗ୍ଯ
ସନ୍ନିବେଶିତ
ସଫଳତା
ସଫାକର
ସଫ୍ଟୱେର
ସବୁ
ସଭା
ସମକାଳିତ
ସମଗ୍ର
ସମତଳ
ସମପର୍କ
ସମମୂଲ୍ଯ
ସମଷ୍ଟି
ସମସ୍ଯା
ସମାଧାନ
ସମାପନ
ସମାପ୍ତ/F
ସମୀକରଣ
ସମୀକ୍ଷା
ସମୂହ
ସମ୍ପନ୍ନ
ସମ୍ପାଦକ
ସମ୍ପାଦନ
ସମ୍ପୂର୍ଣ୍ଣ
ସମ୍ପ୍ରସାରଣ
ସମ୍ବେଦୀ
ସମ୍ଭବ
ସମୟ/v
ସରଳ/q
ସର୍ତ୍ତ
ସର୍ପକ
ସର୍ବଚୟନ
ସର୍ବନିମ୍ନ
ସର୍ବମୋଟ
ସର୍ବାଧିକ
ସର୍ଭର
ସହ/Wsmk
ସହଗ
ସହନୀୟତା
ସହଯୋଗ
ସହସମ୍ବନ୍ଧ
ସହାୟପ୍ରାପ୍ତ
ସାଂଖ୍ଯିକ
ସାଇତିବା
ସାଇରିଲୀୟ
ସାକ୍ଷାତ
ସାଥି
ସାଧନ
ସାଧାରଣ
ସାମଗ୍ରୀ
ସାମର୍ଥିକରଣ
ସାମର୍ଥ୍ଯ
ସାମର୍ଥୟସ୍ତର
ସାମ୍ପ୍ରତିକ
ସାରଣୀ
ସାର୍ବଜନୀନ
ସିଧା
ସିନେରାମା
ସିନ୍ଥେସାଇଜର
ସିମାଫୋର
ସୀମା/gi
ସୀମାରେଖା
ସୁଇଚ୍
ସୁଜି
ସୁଧ
ସୁପାରିଶ
ସୁପ୍ତ
ସୁଯୋଗ
ସୁରକ୍ଷା
ସୁରକ୍ଷିତ
ସୁସଂଗତି
ସୂଚକ
ସୂଚନା/U
ସୂଚାଇବା
ସୂଚୀପତ୍ର
ସୂତ୍ର
ସୃଷ୍ଟି
ସେବକ
ସେଲୁଲାର
ସେଲ୍ଟୀୟ
ସ୍କଜି
ସ୍କୋର
ସ୍କ୍ରିପ୍ଟ
ସ୍କ୍ରୋଲ୍
ସ୍ତମ୍ଭ
ସ୍ତର/u
ସ୍ଥଳୀ
ସ୍ଥାନ/NYK
ସ୍ଥାନାନ୍ତର/A
ସ୍ଥାପନ
ସ୍ଥାପିତ
ସ୍ଥିରବିନ୍ଦୁ
ସ୍ପର୍ଶକ
ସ୍ପିକର
ସ୍ପେନୀୟ
ସ୍ବଚ୍ଛ
ସ୍ବତନ୍ତ୍ରଚର
ସ୍ବତ୍ତ୍ବାଧିକାର
ସ୍ବର
ସ୍ବାକ୍ଷରିହୀନ
ସ୍ବାଗତମ
ସ୍ବିଜରଲାଣ୍ଡୀୟ
ସ୍ବିଡେନୀୟ
ସ୍ବୀକୃତି
ସ୍ବୟଂଚାଳନ
ସ୍ବୟଂସ୍ଥାପନ
ସ୍ମୃତି
ସ୍ରଷ୍ଟା
ସ୍ଲୋଭାକୀୟ
ହର୍ଜ
ହଲାଣ୍ଡୀୟ
ହାକର
ହାଣ୍ଡଲ
ହାର
ହାରାହାରି
ହାଲୁକା
ହିବ୍ରୁ
ହିଷ୍ଟୋଗ୍ରାମ
ହିସାବ
ହୀନ
ହେଉଛି
ହେଉଥିବା
ହୋଷ୍ଟ
ହ୍ଯାଟ
ୟୁକ୍ରେନୀୟ
ୟୁନିକୋଡ୍
ୟୁନିକ୍ସ
ୟୁରୋପୀୟ
ୱିଣ୍ଡୋ
ୱେଲ୍ସ୍
